Missouri, session 2026, HB2879.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 130, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 130.300, to read as follows:
130.300. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Agent of a hostile foreign principal", includes any person:
(a) Who acts as an agent, employee, representative, or servant, or otherwise acts
at the order, request, or under the direction or control of a hostile foreign principal;
(b) Whose actions are financed in whole or in part by a hostile foreign principal;
and
(c) Who engages in political activity;
(2) "Foreign-supported political organization", a political party or a domestic
partnership, association, corporation, organization, or any other combination of persons
that has, within the past five calendar years, received money or other things of value
from a hostile foreign principal or an agent of a hostile foreign principal and which
engages in political activity;
(3) "Hostile foreign country", any foreign nation that has been determined to be
a foreign adversary by the United States Department of Commerce under 15 C.F.R.
791.4;
(4) "Hostile foreign principal", includes:
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2879 2
(a) A government of a hostile foreign country, a political party of a hostile
foreign country, or any member of a political party of a hostile foreign country;
(b) A nonresident alien of a hostile foreign country;
(c) A partnership, association, corporation, organization, or other combination
of persons organized under the law of or having its principal place of business in a
hostile foreign country; and
(d) A domestic partnership, association, corporation, organization, or other
combination of persons that is under the control of a hostile foreign government, a
nonresident alien of a hostile foreign country, or an entity organized under the laws of
or having its principal place of business in a hostile foreign country;
(5) "Political activity", any activity that is performed to influence any agency or
public official of the state of Missouri, any local government entity within the state of
Missouri, or to influence the public within the state of Missouri, with reference to
formulating, adopting, or changing the policies or laws of the state of Missouri or
electing or opposing a candidate for local or state public office.
2. No person shall act as an agent of a hostile foreign principal unless he or she
has filed with the Missouri ethics commission a true and complete registration statement
and supplements thereto as required by this section or unless he or she is exempt from
registration under the provisions of this section. Except as hereinafter provided, every
person who becomes an agent of a hostile foreign principal shall, within ten days
thereafter, file with the Missouri ethics commission a registration statement, under oath,
on a form prescribed by the commission. The obligation of an agent of a hostile foreign
principal to file a registration statement shall, after the tenth day of his or her becoming
such agent, continue from day to day, and termination of such status shall not relieve
such agent from the obligation to file a registration statement for the period during
which he or she was an agent of a hostile foreign principal. The registration statement
shall include the following:
(1) The registrant's name, principal business address, all other business
addresses in the United States or elsewhere, and all residential addresses, if any;
(2) A comprehensive statement of the nature of the registrant's business;
(3) A statement of the nature of the work of each hostile foreign principal for
whom the registrant is acting, assuming or purporting to act, or has agreed to act, and
the character of the business or other activities of every such hostile foreign principal. If
any such hostile foreign principal be other than a natural person, such statement shall
also detail the ownership and control by which each such hostile foreign principal is
supervised, directed, owned, controlled, financed, or subsidized, in whole or in part, by

HB 2879 3
any government of a hostile foreign country or political party of a hostile foreign
country, or by any other hostile foreign principal;
(4) The nature and amount of contributions, income, money, or thing of value, if
any, that the registrant has received within the preceding sixty days from each such
hostile foreign principal, either as compensation or for disbursement or otherwise, and
the form and time of each such payment and from whom received;
(5) A detailed statement of every activity which the registrant is performing, is
assuming or purporting to perform, or has agreed to perform for himself or herself or
any other person other than a hostile foreign principal and which requires his or her
registration;
(6) The name, business, and residence addresses, and if an individual, the
nationality, of any person other than a hostile foreign principal for whom the registrant
is acting, assuming or purporting to act, or has agreed to act under such circumstances
as require his or her registration hereunder;
(7) The nature and amount of contributions, income, money, or thing of value, if
any, that the registrant has received during the preceding sixty days from each such
person in connection with any of the activities referred to in subdivision (6) of this
subsection;
(8) A detailed statement of the money and other things of value spent or disposed
of by the registrant during the preceding sixty days in furtherance of or in connection
with activities which require the registrant's registration under this section and which
have been undertaken by the registrant either as an agent of a hostile foreign principal
or for himself or herself or any other person or in connection with any activities relating
to the registrant becoming an agent of such principal;
(9) A detailed statement of any contributions of money or other things of value
made by the registrant during the preceding sixty days to bring about the nomination or
election of a candidate for any office, to bring about the recall of a public officer holding
elective office, to oppose the recall of a public officer holding elective office, and to bring
about the approval or rejection by the voters of any proposed constitutional
amendment, a state-wide referendum, or a proposed question which is to appear on
the ballot in this state or in a county or a municipal election in this state; and
(10) Such other statements, information, or documents pertinent to the purposes
of this section as the Missouri ethics commission may from time to time require.
3. No later than January 1, 2027, each foreign-supported political organization
shall register with the Missouri ethics commission and provide the following
information:

HB 2879 4
(1) The name of the organization, its business address, and the names, titles, and
addresses of all officers and directors of the organization;
(2) If the organization is affiliated with or a chapter of a national organization,
the name of the national organization, its address, and the names and addresses of its
officers and directors;
(3) A detailed statement of any expenditures of money or other things of value
made by the organization within the prior calendar year to influence any agency or
public official of the state of Missouri, any local government entity within the state of
Missouri, or the public within the state of Missouri, with reference to formulating,
adopting, or changing the policies or laws of the state of Missouri or electing a candidate
to local or state public office; and
100 (4) A detailed statement of all money or other things of value received by the
101 organization from a hostile foreign principal or an agent of a hostile foreign principal
102 during the preceding calendar year.
103 4. The Missouri ethics commission shall require the information required under
104 subsections 2 and 3 of this section to updated on no less than a quarterly basis.
105 5. Upon receipt of a complaint that an agent of a hostile foreign principal or a
106 foreign-supported political organization has failed to comply with the registration and
107 reporting requirements of this section, or upon its own determination, the Missouri
108 ethics commission shall have authority to investigate and to assess penalties for the
109 violation of this section. The commission may assess penalties up to and including the
110 following:
111 (1) For any violation, up to five hundred dollars per infraction; and
112 (2) For willful or repeated violations, up to ten thousand dollars per infraction
113 and disbarment.
114
115 The Missouri ethics commission may refer any matter to the attorney general for
116 further civil or criminal action.
117 6. The Missouri ethics commission may promulgate all necessary rules and
118 regulations for the administration of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that
119 term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this
120 section shall become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
121 provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter
122 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
123 pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul

HB 2879 5
124 a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority
125 and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✔